Hawaii statutes.
§174-7 Issuance of revenue bonds. The
board of land and natural resources shall have the power to issue revenue
bonds, as provided by part III of chapter 39 to finance in whole or in part,
the cost of construction, acquisition, or maintenance of any facility or
project hereunder, and, in connection therewith, to pledge for the punctual
payment of the bonds, and interest thereon, any and all revenues derived from
the project or projects for the construction, acquisition, or maintenance of
which the bonds were issued, and the revenue of other or all projects, in an
amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest of the bonds as they become
due, and to create and maintain reasonable reserves or sinking funds therefor.
Funds of the board, not otherwise required, may be advanced to pay necessary
expenses incurred in making preparation for the initial issuance of bonds under
this chapter, and to take any other action necessary or proper in connection
therewith. Any project authorized by this chapter shall be designated an
"undertaking" within the meaning of part III of chapter 39 and shall
be the public undertaking, the revenues of which are hereby charged with the
payment of the principal and interest of the bonds. [L 1961, c 166, pt of §3;
Supp, §86-6; HRS §174-7]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next